Utah statutes.
63E-2-109 (Superseded 05/01/13).   State statutes.

(1)  Except as specifically modified in its authorizing statute, each independent corporation shall be exempt from the statutes governing state agencies, including:

(a)  Title 51, Chapter 5, Funds Consolidation Act;

(b)  Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(c)  Title 63A, Utah Administrative Services Code;

(d)  Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act;

(e)  Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act;

(f)  Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah Procurement Code;

(g)  Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act;

(h)  Title 63J, Chapter 2, Revenue Procedures and Control Act; and

(i)  Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah Personnel Management Act.

(2)  Except as specifically modified in its authorizing statute, each independent corporation shall be subject to:

(a)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act; and

(b)  Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act.

(3)  Each independent corporation board may adopt its own policies and procedures governing its:

(a)  funds management;

(b)  audits; and

(c)  personnel.

